Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-142.10
Vehicle manufactured more than thirty years prior to application for certificate of title; fee.

For each certificate of title issued by the department under section 60-142.09, the fee shall be twenty-five dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2017, LB263, § 11.